Nevada, session 83, AB75.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them
in those sections.
Sec. 3. 1. “Grant” means a legal instrument of financial
assistance between a State grant-making entity and a nonprofit
organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c), that is:
(a) Used to enter into a relationship the principal purpose of
which is to transfer anything of value from the State grant-making
entity to the grant recipient to carry out a public purpose
authorized by law and not to acquire property or services for the
direct benefit or use of the State grant-making entity;
(b) Used to provide for one or more payments in
reimbursement for services or other performance under the
agreement on a scheduled or other incremental basis; and
(c) Distinguished from a cooperative agreement in that it does
not provide for substantial involvement between the State grant-
making entity and the grant recipient in carrying out the activity
contemplated by the award.
2. The term does not include an instrument that provides
only:
-
*AB75*

– 3 –
(a) Direct government cash assistance to a person;
(b) A subsidy;
(c) A loan;
(d) A loan guarantee;
(e) Insurance; or
(f) State funding that is required annually and is calculated
through a formula set in statute.
Sec. 4. “Payment” includes all processing and authorization
required by law from the State Board of Examiners, the Director
of the Office of Finance and the State Controller.
Sec. 5. “Proper invoice” means a bill, a written document or
an electronic transmission readable by the State grant-making
entity, provided by a grant recipient, that:
1. Requests an amount that is due and payable by law under
a written grant agreement; and
2. Includes:
(a) The federal employer identification number or social
security number of the grant recipient;
(b) Sufficient information to identify the grant agreement; and
(c) Any additional documentation the grant agreement
requires.
Sec. 6. The provisions of sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this act
do not apply to:
1. The Legislative Department or Judicial Department of
State Government;
2. The Nevada System of Higher Education or any institution
of the Nevada System of Higher Education; or
3. Grants funded from general obligation bond proceeds or
from an appropriation made to the State Public Works Division of
the Department of Administration to support the Division in
carrying out a program of capital improvements.
Sec. 7. The Legislature declares that it is the policy of this
State to make a payment under a grant agreement within 37 days
after the later of:
1. The date on which the payment becomes due under the
grant agreement; or
2. The date on which the State grant-making entity receives a
proper invoice.
Sec. 8. 1. A State grant-making entity shall be liable for
interest at a rate of 9 percent per annum on any amount:
(a) That is due and payable by law under a written grant
agreement; and
(b) Which the State grant-making entity has failed, within 30
days after receipt of a proper invoice, to submit for payment in the
same manner as other claims against the State are paid.
-
*AB75*

– 4 –
2. Interest under this section shall accrue beginning on the
38th day after the date on which the State grant-making entity
receives a proper invoice.
3. A State grant-making entity is not liable for interest
pursuant to this section:
(a) Unless the grant recipient submits an invoice for the
interest within 30 days after receiving payment for the amount on
which the interest accrued;
(b) If the State grant-making entity has initiated legal
proceedings to dispute the amount owed to the grant recipient;
(c) Accruing more than 1 year after the 31st day after the State
grant-making entity receives a proper invoice; or
(d) On an amount that represents unpaid interest.
4. Interest for which a State grant-making entity is liable
pursuant to this section:
(a) Must be paid from the operating budget of the State grant-
making entity; and
(b) May not be paid from funds appropriated to fund a grant.
5. For the purposes of determining the due date of a payment
and the date on which interest begins to accrue, an invoice is
deemed to be received:
(a) For invoices that are mailed, when a proper invoice is
received by the State grant-making entity, as of the date the State
grant-making entity annotates the invoice with the date and time
of receipt; or
(b) For invoices that are transmitted electronically, on the date
the transmission is received by the State grant-making entity or the
next business day if the transmission is received after 5 p.m.
Sec. 9. 1. Upon receipt of an invoice, a State grant-making
entity shall:
(a) Mark the invoice with the date the invoice was received;
and
(b) Review the invoice as soon as practicable to determine
whether the invoice is a proper invoice.
2. If the State grant-making entity determines that the
invoice:
(a) Is a proper invoice, the State grant-making entity shall
submit the invoice for payment in the same manner as other
claims against the State are paid.
(b) Is not a proper invoice, within 2 business days after making
such a determination, the State grant-making entity shall notify
the grant recipient of all defects that prevent the invoice from
being a proper invoice. It is the responsibility of the grant recipient
to submit a corrected invoice.
3. A State grant-making entity:
-
*AB75*

– 5 –
(a) May use media that produce tangible recordings of
information to expedite the payment process, rather than delaying
the processes by requiring original paper documents; and
(b) Shall provide adequate safeguards and controls to ensure
the integrity of the data and to prevent duplicate processing.
4. Failure by a State grant-making entity to comply with the
procedural requirements of this section does not constitute a late
payment.
Sec. 10. The provisions of this act apply only to a grant, as
defined in section 3 of this act, which is executed, renewed or
extended on or after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 11. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB75*